Florida, session 2026, SB1420.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 24 25 Section 1.âSection 125.483, Florida Statutes, is created to 26 read: 27 125.483âCounty utility revenues.â 28 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âutilityâ includes 29 public entities providing water, wastewater, stormwater, 30 electric, and gas utilities. 31 (2)âThe Legislature intends for a county that provides 32 utility services to its residents to provide such services in an 33 affordable, transparent, and reliable manner that protects 34 public health and this stateâs natural resources. 35 (3)âNotwithstanding any law to the contrary, a county that 36 generates revenue from providing utility services to customers 37 may not transfer any revenues collected for providing utility 38 services to finance general governmental functions or special 39 projects, to purchase bonds to finance general governmental 40 functions, or to lend money to finance general governmental 41 functions within the local government which are not for the 42 ongoing utility service or a part of the utility. A revenue 43 surplus must be returned to the ratepayers. Such returns may 44 include rebates, credits, or new appliances or services. 45 (4)âA county shall reinvest utility service revenues back 46 into the utility for purposes of operational integrity. Such 47 investments may include building, maintaining, renovating, or 48 otherwise improving the infrastructure of its utility 49 facilities. The utility must, every 5 years, develop a budget 50 forecast and strategies that ensure continuous maintenance, as 51 well as strategic improvements to provide optimal service 52 performance at consistent rates. The budget forecast and 53 strategies must anticipate increasing service demand due to 54 population growth and new commercial industries, expenditures on 55 advanced technologies, and costs incurred from damages and 56 complications arising from intensifying storms, floods, and 57 water shortages. 58 (5)âA county may not charge a higher rate or add a 59 surcharge to customers outside of jurisdictional boundaries 60 which is greater than the actual costs of providing services at 61 locations more distal from central utility operations. 62 (6)âA violation of this section shall be cause for the 63 withholding from the countyâs utility of any portion of any 64 state funds to which the utility may be entitled. 65 Section 2.âSection 180.1901, Florida Statutes, is created 66 to read: 67 180.1901âMunicipal utility revenues.â 68 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âutilityâ includes 69 water, wastewater, stormwater, electric, and gas utilities. 70 (2)âThe Legislature intends for a municipality that 71 provides utility services to its residents to provide such 72 services in an affordable, transparent, and reliable manner that 73 protects public health and this stateâs natural resources. 74 (3)âNotwithstanding any law to the contrary, a municipality 75 that generates revenue from providing utility services to 76 customers may not transfer any revenues collected for providing 77 utility services to finance general governmental functions or 78 special projects, to purchase bonds to finance general 79 governmental functions, or to lend money to finance general 80 governmental functions within the local government which are not 81 for the ongoing utility service or part of the utility. A 82 revenue surplus must be returned to the ratepayers. Such returns 83 may include rebates, credits, or new appliances or services. 84 (4)âA municipality shall reinvest utility service revenues 85 back into the utility for purposes of operational integrity. 86 Such investments may include building, maintaining, renovating, 87 or otherwise improving the infrastructure of its utility 88 facilities. The utility must, every 5 years, develop a budget 89 forecast and strategies that ensure continuous maintenance, as 90 well as strategic improvements to provide optimal service 91 performance at consistent rates. The budget forecast and 92 strategies must anticipate increasing service demand due to 93 population growth and new commercial industries, expenditures on 94 advanced technologies, and costs incurred from damages and 95 complications arising from intensifying storms, floods, and 96 water shortages. 97 (5)âA municipality may not charge a higher rate or add a 98 surcharge to customers outside of jurisdictional boundaries 99 which is greater than the actual costs of providing services at 100 locations more distal from central utility operations. 101 (6)âA violation of this section shall be cause for the 102 withholding from the municipalityâs utility of any portion of 103 any state funds to which the utility may be entitled. 104 Section 3.âSubsection (1) of section 180.191, Florida 105 Statutes, is amended to read: 106 180.191âLimitation on rates charged consumer outside city 107 limits.â 108 (1)âAny municipality within this the state operating a 109 water or sewer utility outside of the boundaries of such 110 municipality shall charge consumers outside the boundaries 111 rates, fees, and charges determined in one of the following 112 manners: 113 (a)âIt may charge the same rates, fees, and charges as 114 consumers inside the municipal boundaries. However, in addition 115 thereto, the municipality may add a surcharge of not more than 116 25 percent of such rates, fees, and charges to consumers outside 117 the boundaries. Fixing of such rates, fees, and charges in this 118 manner may shall not require a public hearing except as may be 119 provided for service to consumers inside the municipality. 120 (b)âIt may charge rates, fees, and charges that are just 121 and equitable and which are based on the same factors used in 122 fixing the rates, fees, and charges for consumers inside the 123 municipal boundaries. In addition thereto, the municipality may 124 add a surcharge not to exceed 25 percent of such rates, fees, 125 and charges for said services to consumers outside the 126 boundaries. However, the total of all Such rates, fees, and 127 charges for the services to consumers outside the boundaries may 128 shall not be more than 50 percent in excess of the rates, fees, 129 and charges total amount the municipality charges consumers 130 served within the municipality for corresponding service. No 131 Such rates, fees, and charges may not shall be fixed until after 132 a public hearing at which all of the users of the water or sewer 133 systems; owners, tenants, or occupants of property served or to 134 be served thereby; and all others interested shall have an 135 opportunity to be heard concerning the proposed rates, fees, and 136 charges. Any change or revision of such rates, fees, or charges 137 may be made in the same manner as such rates, fees, or charges 138 were originally established, but if such change or revision is 139 to be made substantially pro rata as to all classes of service, 140 both inside and outside the municipality, no hearing or notice 141 shall be required. 142 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.